Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin EMERGENCY FAMILY SHELTERS; ACQUISITION AND REHABILITATION.new text end new text begin $....... is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Interfaith Action for the acquisition and rehabilitation of space to expand shelter capacity and improve services for families experiencing homelessness. Grant proceeds may be used for child-friendly spaces, trauma-informed design, and on-site support services. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned. new text end